New York, session 2025-2026, A784.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "AC in Residencies (AIR) Act". 3 § 2. The multiple dwelling law is amended by adding a new section 85 4 to read as follows: 5 § 85. Mandatory cooling centers. 1. Every multiple dwelling that is 6 over eighty feet in height; has more than one hundred residents; or is 7 operated for occupancy by persons fifty-five years of age or older 8 pursuant to Sec. 807(b)(2)(c) (42 U.S.C. 3607(b)(2)(c)) of the federal 9 Fair Housing Act of 1988, as amended, shall be provided with permanent 10 cooling and dehumidification equipment in at least one indoor common 11 gathering space in such multiple dwelling. 12 2. Such areas shall be made available to residents of such multiple 13 dwellings as cooling centers during such times when the outdoor heat 14 index exceeds eighty degrees Fahrenheit. 15 3. Temporary or portable cooling and dehumidification equipment may be 16 used to meet the requirements of this section prior to, but not later 17 than, two years following the effective date of this section. 18 § 3. The multiple residence law is amended by adding a new section 175 19 to read as follows: 20 § 175. Mandatory cooling centers. 1. Every multiple residence that is 21 over eighty feet in height; has more than one hundred residents; or is 22 operated for occupancy by persons fifty-five years of age or older EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00307-02-5 A. 784 2 1 pursuant to Sec. 807(b)(2)(c) (42 U.S.C. 3607(b)(2)(c)) of the federal 2 Fair Housing Act of 1988, as amended, shall be provided with permanent 3 cooling and dehumidification equipment in at least one indoor common 4 gathering space in each such multiple residence. 5 2. Such areas shall be made available to residents of such multiple 6 residences as cooling centers during such times when the outdoor heat 7 index exceeds eighty degrees Fahrenheit. 8 3. Temporary or portable cooling and dehumidification equipment may be 9 used to meet the requirements of this section prior to, but not later 10 than, two years following the effective date of this section. 11 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 12 it shall have become a law.